Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Fund

47-8-1.
Creation of the office of senior judge of the superior courts.

There is created the office of senior judge of the superior courts. Any judge of the superior court who was appointed judge of the superior courts, emeritus prior to December 31, 1976, is redesignated as senior judge of the superior courts effective December 31, 1976. Any judge of the superior courts who is eligible for appointment as judge of the superior courts, emeritus on December 31, 1976, or who becomes eligible after that date shall be designated as senior judge of the superior courts upon accepting such appointment.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, § 31; Ga. L. 1982, p. 497, §§ 2, 3.

47-8-2.
Creation of the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia; trustees of the fund; payment to the fund.

There is created the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia. The trustees of the fund shall be the Governor, the state treasurer, and an appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General. All payments to this fund shall be made to the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 8; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the middle of this Code section.

47-8-3.
Power of trustees to make rules and regulations for administration of the fund.

The trustees of this fund are authorized to make such rules and regulations as are not inconsistent with this chapter for the proper administration of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 17.

47-8-4.
Power of trustees to invest moneys of the fund.

The trustees of this fund shall have authority to invest any of the moneys received under this chapter in such manner as funds of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia are invested and reinvested.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 18; Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 4.

47-8-5.
Annual audit of the fund.

The state auditor is authorized to make an annual audit of the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 19.

47-8-6.
Administration of the fund.

The trustees shall contract with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for the administration of the fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-8-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 787, § 1.